Massachusetts, session 194th, H3990.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Item 7004-9316 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “processing time” the following words:- ; provided further, that the
executive office shall not require a notice to quit from a landlord for a household to be eligible
for assistance; provided further, that the executive office shall establish, in consultation with the
joint committee on housing, criteria for demonstrating that a household is experiencing
homelessness or is at risk of homelessness, and shall solicit public feedback when developing
such criteria.
of 1